Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1284
Official records; signature of custodian; genuineness presumed, when.

In the cases contemplated in sections 25-1280, 25-1282 and 25-1283, the signature of the officer shall be presumed to be genuine until the contrary is shown.

R.S.1867, Code § 412, p. 462;

R.S.1913, § 7977;

C.S.1922, § 8918;

C.S.1929, § 20-1284;

R.S.1943, § 25-1284.

Field notes and tract book were sufficiently authenticated. Worm v. Crowell, 165 Neb. 713, 87 N.W.2d 384 (1958).

It is not necessary to prove signature of county clerk accompanying jurat to oath lawfully filed in his office. Merriam v. Coffee, 16 Neb. 450, 20 N.W. 389 (1884).